Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB750.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2116(a)(1.3) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 2116. Inheritance Tax.--(a) * * *(1.3) Inheritance tax upon the transfer of property passing to or for the use of a sibling shall be at the rate [of twelve per cent.] provided in the following schedule:(i) Twelve per cent for the estate of a decedent dying before July 1, 202 6. 12345678910111213141516171819202122 (ii) Eleven per cent for the estate of a decedent dying on or after July 1, 2026, and before July 1, 2027.(iii) Ten per cent for the estate of a decedent dying on or after July 1, 2027, and before July 1, 2028.(iv) Nine per cent for the estate of a decedent dying on or after July 1, 2028, and before July 1, 2029.(v) Eight per cent for the estate of a decedent dying on or after July 1, 2029, and before July 1, 2030.(vi) Six per cent for the estate of a decedent dying on or after July 1, 2030, and before July 1, 2031.(vii) Four per cent for the estate of a decedent dying on or after July 1, 2031, and before July 1, 2032.(viii) Two per cent for the estate of a decedent dying on or after July 1, 2032, and before July 1, 2033.(ix) Zero per cent for the estate of a decedent dying on or after July 1, 2033, and each year thereafter.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0750PN0924 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718